Oklahoma, session 2026, SB393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1253, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 65, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1253), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1253. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2025 July 1, 2027, in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sunset Law, the State Board of Licensed Social Workers,
consisting of seven (7) members.
B. Three of the members of the Board shall be licensed social
workers or licensed clinical social workers licensed pursuant to the
provisions of the Social Worker’s Licensing Act. Two members shall
be licensed as either social work associates or master’s social
workers. One member shall be the president of the Oklahoma Chapter
of the National Association of Social Workers. The remaining member

of the Board shall be selected from and shall represent the general
public.
C. Responsibility for enforcement of the provisions of this act
the Social Worker’s Licensing Act is hereby vested in the State
Board of Social Work. The Board shall have all of the duties,
powers, and authority specifically granted by, or necessary for, the
enforcement of this act the Social Worker’s Licensing Act as well as
other duties, powers, and authority it may be granted by applicable
law.
D. 1. Each member of the Board appointed as a social worker
shall:
a. be a resident of this state,
b. be licensed in good standing to engage in the practice
of social work in this state,
c. at the time of appointment, have been actively engaged
in the practice of social work for at least one (1)
year out of the last five (5) years, and
d. have at least three (3) years of experience in the
practice of social work.
2. Each member of the Board appointed to represent the general
public shall be a resident of this state who has attained the age of
majority and shall not be, nor shall ever have been, a social work
licensee, or the spouse of a social work licensee, or a person who
has ever had any material financial interest in the provision of
social work services or has engaged in any activity directly related
to the practice of social work.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 393 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 17th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 393 Page 3